Utah statutes.
48-2c-1401.   Conversion of certain entities to a domestic company.
(1)  As used in this part, the term "subject entity" means and includes a
corporation, business trust or association, a real estate investment trust, a
common-law trust, or any other unincorporated business, including a general
partnership, a registered limited liability partnership, a limited
partnership, a nonprofit corporation, or a foreign company.
(2)  Any subject entity may convert to a domestic company by complying with
Section 48-2c-1404 and filing with the division:
(a)  articles of conversion that satisfy the requirements of Section
48-2c-1402; and
(b)  articles of organization that satisfy the requirements of Part 4,
Formation.
